Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.030

Director—Powers and duties.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1874.SL) ***

In addition to any other duties imposed by law, including RCW 18.235.030 and 18.235.040, the director shall have the following powers and duties:

(1) To set all license, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.24.086;

(2) To adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter;

(3) To prepare and administer or approve the preparation and administration of licensing examinations;

(4) To establish minimum safety and sanitation standards for schools, instructors, cosmetologists, barbers, hair designers, manicurists, estheticians, master estheticians, salons/shops, personal services, and mobile units;

(5) To establish curricula for the training of students and apprentices under this chapter;

(6) To maintain the official department record of applicants and licensees;

(7) To establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure;

(8) To set license expiration dates and renewal periods for all licenses consistent with this chapter; and

(9) To make information available to the department of revenue to assist in collecting taxes from persons required to be licensed under this chapter.

[ 2019 c 442 s 7; 2015 c 62 s 2; 2013 c 187 s 2; 2008 c 20 s 2; 2004 c 51 s 7. Prior: 2002 c 111 s 3; 2002 c 86 s 213; 1991 c 324 s 2; 1984 c 208 s 7.]

NOTES:

Notice of chapter 51, Laws of 2004—Effective date—2004 c 51: See notes following RCW 18.16.060.

Effective date—2002 c 111: See note following RCW 18.16.010.

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.